District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

42-1763

Criminal penalties; prosecutions.

Repealed.

History

Mar. 10, 1983, D.C. Law 4-209, § 27, 30 DCR 390
Oct. 5, 1985, D.C. Law 6-42, § 405, 32 DCR 4450
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 1233(aa), 46 DCR 3142

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 45-1946.